Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201721-275
Subpart definitions.

(MBCA 7.40) In sections 21-275 to 21-282:

(1) Derivative proceeding means a civil suit in the right of a domestic corporation or, to the extent provided in section 21-282, in the right of a foreign corporation.

(2) Shareholder means a record shareholder, a beneficial shareholder, and an unrestricted voting trust beneficial owner.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 75;

Laws 2017, LB35, § 12.
January 1, 2018